Minnesota, session 2025-2026, HF2398.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: Section 1. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 45.24, is amended to read: 45.24 LICENSE TECHNOLOGY FEES. (a) The commissioner may establish and maintain an electronic licensing database system for license origination, renewal, and tracking the completion of continuing education requirements by individual licensees who have continuing education requirements, and other related purposes. (b) The commissioner shall pay for the cost of operating and maintaining the electronic database system described in paragraph (a) through a technology surcharge imposed upon the fee for license origination and renewal, for individual licenses that require continuing education. (c) The surcharge permitted under paragraph (b) shall be up to $40 for each two-year licensing period, except as otherwise provided in paragraph (f), and shall be payable at the time of license origination and renewal. (d) The Commerce Department technology account is hereby created as an account in the special revenue fund. (e) The commissioner shall deposit the surcharge permitted under this section in the account created in paragraph (d), and funds in the account are appropriated to the commissioner in the amounts needed for purposes of this section. The commissioner of management and budget shall transfer an amount determined by the commissioner of commerce from the account to the statewide electronic licensing system account under section 16E.22 for the costs of the statewide licensing system attributable to the inclusion of licenses subject to this section. (f) The commissioner deleted text begin shalldeleted text end new text begin maynew text end temporarily reduce or suspend the surcharge as necessary if the balance in the account created in paragraph (d) exceeds $2,000,000 as of the end ofnew text begin June innew text end any calendar year and deleted text begin shalldeleted text end new text begin must annually review the anticipated costs under paragraph (b) to determine the amount tonew text end increase or decrease the surcharge deleted text begin as necessarydeleted text end to keep the fund balance at an adequate level but not in excess of $2,000,000. Sec. 2. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 46A.04, is amended to read: 46A.04 EXCEPTIONS AND EXEMPTIONS. (a) The requirements under section 46A.03, subdivisions 3new text begin , paragraph (b)new text end ; 5, paragraph deleted text begin (a)deleted text end new text begin (b)new text end ; 9; and 10, do not apply to financial institutions that maintain customer information concerning fewer than 5,000 consumers. (b) This chapter does not apply to credit unions or federally insured depository institutions. Sec. 3. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 47.77, is amended to read: 47.77 TRANSFER OF ACCOUNTS PROHIBITED; NOTICE ON CLOSING. (a) No financial institution shall initiate a transfer of a deposit account to another deposit account bearing different identification information without sending at least 30 days' prior notice to at least one of the deposit account holders at the last known address on file with the financial institution. If the new account is subject to different terms, the financial institution must obtain the written consent of at least one of the deposit account holders before the new terms become effective. (b) No financial institution shall initiate a closure of a deposit account without first sending at least one of the deposit account holders a notice of intent to close the deposit account. The notice must be sent to the deposit account holder's last known address on file with the financial institution at least 30 days before the financial institution closes the deposit accountdeleted text begin ;deleted text end new text begin ,new text end except thatdeleted text begin ,deleted text end if the financial institution has reasonable suspicion to believe that account is being used in connection with a check-related fraud or other crime deleted text begin or thatdeleted text end new text begin ,new text end funds will not be available to pay items drawn on the account,new text begin or the deposit account holder has engaged in disruptive, hostile, or harassing behavior toward financial institution employees or customers,new text end the notice may be sent the same day as the account is closed. (c) As used in this section, the following terms have the meanings given them. "Deposit account" means a contract of deposit of funds between a depositor and a financial institution, and includes a checking account, savings account, certificate of deposit share account, and other like arrangement. "Financial institution" means any organization authorized to do business under state or federal laws relating to financial institutions, including, without limitation, banks and trust companies, savings banks, savings associations, industrial loan and thrift companies, and credit unions. Sec. 4. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 53B.61, is amended to read: 53B.61 MAINTENANCE OF PERMISSIBLE INVESTMENTS. (a) A licensee must maintain at all times permissible investments that have a market value computed in accordance with United States generally accepted accounting principles of not less than the aggregate amount of all of the licensee's outstanding money transmission obligations. (b) Except for permissible investments enumerated in section 53B.62, deleted text begin paragraph (a)deleted text end new text begin subdivision 1new text end new text begin , clause (1)new text end , the commissioner may by administrative rule or order, with respect to any licensee, limit the extent to which a specific investment maintained by a licensee within a class of permissible investments may be considered a permissible investment, if the specific investment represents undue risk to customers not reflected in the market value of investments. (c) Permissible investments, even if commingled with other assets of the licensee, are held in trust for the benefit of the purchasers and holders of the licensee's outstanding money transmission obligations in the event of insolvency; the filing of a petition by or against the licensee under the United States Bankruptcy Code, United States Code, title 11, sections 101 to 110, as amended or recodified from time to time, for bankruptcy or reorganization; the filing of a petition by or against the licensee for receivership; the commencement of any other judicial or administrative proceeding for the licensee's dissolution or reorganization; or in the event of an action by a creditor against the licensee who is not a beneficiary of this statutory trust. No permissible investments impressed with a trust pursuant to this paragraph are subject to attachment, levy of execution, or sequestration by order of any court, except for a beneficiary of the statutory trust. (d) Upon the establishment of a statutory trust in accordance with paragraph (c), or when any funds are drawn on a letter of credit pursuant to section 53B.62, paragraph (a), clause (4), the commissioner must notify the applicable regulator of each state in which the licensee is licensed to engage in money transmission, if any, of the establishment of the trust or the funds drawn on the letter of credit, as applicable. Notice is deemed satisfied if performed pursuant to a multistate agreement or through NMLS. Funds drawn on a letter of credit, and any other permissible investments held in trust for the benefit of the purchasers and holders of the licensee's outstanding money transmission obligations, are deemed held in trust for the benefit of the purchasers and holders of the licensee's outstanding money transmission obligations on a pro rata and equitable basis in accordance with statutes pursuant to which permissible investments are required to be held in Minnesota and other states, as defined by a substantially similar statute in the other state. Any statutory trust established under this section terminates upon extinguishment of all of the licensee's outstanding money transmission obligations. (e) The commissioner may by rule or by order allow other types of investments that the commissioner determines are of sufficient liquidity and quality to be a permissible investment. The commissioner is authorized to participate in efforts with other state regulators to determine that other types of investments are of sufficient liquidity and quality to be a permissible investment. Sec. 5. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 55.07, is amended by adding a subdivision to read: new text begin Subd. 3. new text end new text begin Safe deposit lease; automatic renewal. new text end new text begin A safe deposit lease may renew automatically at the end of the lease's term. A consumer may terminate a safe deposit lease at any time in writing or in any other manner described in the lease. new text end Sec. 6. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 58B.02, subdivision 8a, is amended to read: Subd. 8a. Lender. "Lender" means an entity engaged in the business of securing, making, or extending student loans. Lender does not include, to the extent that state regulation is preempted by federal law: (1) a bank, savings banks, savings and loan association, or credit union; (2) a wholly owned subsidiary of a bank or credit union; (3) an operating subsidiary where each owner is wholly owned by the same bank or credit union; (4) the United States government, through Title IV of the Higher Education Act of 1965, as amended, and administered by the United States Department of Education; (5) an agency, instrumentality, or political subdivision of Minnesota; (6) a regulated lender organized under chapter 56, except that a regulated lender must file the annual report required for lenders under section 58B.03, subdivision deleted text begin 11deleted text end new text begin 10new text end ; or (7) a person who is not in the business of making student loans and who makes no more than three student loans, with the person's own funds, during any 12-month period. Sec. 7. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 62Q.73, subdivision 4, is amended to read: Subd. 4. Contract. Pursuant to a request for proposal, deleted text begin the commissioner of administration, in consultation withdeleted text end the commissioners of health and commercedeleted text begin , shalldeleted text end new text begin mustnew text end contract with deleted text begin at least three organizationsdeleted text end new text begin more than one organizationnew text end or business deleted text begin entitiesdeleted text end new text begin entitynew text end to provide independent external reviews of all adverse determinations submitted for external review. The contract deleted text begin shalldeleted text end new text begin mustnew text end ensure that the fees for services rendered in connection with the reviews are reasonable. Sec. 8. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 80A.66, is amended to read: 80A.66 SECTION 411; POSTREGISTRATION REQUIREMENTS. (a) Financial requirements. Subject to Section 15(h) of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934 (15 U.S.C. Section 78o(h)) or Section 222 of the Investment Advisers Act of 1940 (15 U.S.C. Section 80b-22), a rule adopted or order issued under this chapter may establish minimum financial requirements for broker-dealers registered or required to be registered under this chapter and investment advisers registered or required to be registered under this chapter. (b) Financial reports. Subject to Section 15(h) of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934 (15 U.S.C. Section 78o(h)) or Section 222(b) of the Investment Advisers Act of 1940 (15 U.S.C. Section 80b-22), a broker-dealer registered or required to be registered under this chapter and an investment adviser registered or required to be registered under this chapter shall file such financial reports as are required by a rule adopted or order issued under this chapter. If the information contained in a record filed under this subsection is or becomes inaccurate or incomplete in a material respect, the registrant shall promptly file a correcting amendment. (c) Record keeping. Subject to Section 15(h) of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934 (15 U.S.C. Section 78o(h)) or Section 222 of the Investment Advisers Act of 1940 (15 U.S.C. Section 80b-22): (1) a broker-dealer registered or required to be registered under this chapter and an investment adviser registered or required to be registered under this chapter shall make and maintain the accounts, correspondence, memoranda, papers, books, and other records required by rule adopted or order issued under this chapter; (2) broker-dealer records required to be maintained under paragraph (1) may be maintained in any form of data storage acceptable under Section 17(a) of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934 (15 U.S.C. Section 78q(a)) if they are readily accessible to the administrator; and (3) investment adviser records required to be maintained under paragraph (d)(1) may be maintained in any form of data storage required by rule adopted or order issued under this chapter. (d) Records and reports of private funds. (1) In general. An investment adviser to a private fund shall maintain such records of, and file with the administrator such reports and amendments thereto, that an exempt reporting adviser is required to file with the Securities and Exchange Commission pursuant to SEC Rule 204-4, Code of Federal Regulations, title 17, section 275.204-4. (2) Treatment of records. The records and reports of any private fund to which an investment adviser provides investment advice shall be deemed to be the records and reports of the investment adviser. (3) Required information. The records and reports required to be maintained by an investment adviser, which are subject to inspection by a representative of the administrator at any time, shall include for each private fund advised by the investment adviser, a description of: (A) the amount of assets under management; (B) the use of leverage, including off-balance-sheet leverage, as to the assets under management; (C) counterparty credit risk exposure; (D) trading and investment positions; (E) valuation policies and practices of the fund; (F) types of assets held; (G) side arrangements or side letters, whereby certain investors in a fund obtain more favorable rights or entitlements than other investors; (H) trading practices; and (I) such other information as the administrator determines is necessary and appropriate in the public interest and for the protection of investors, which may include the establishment of different reporting requirements for different classes of fund advisers, based on the type or size of the private fund being advised. (4) Filing of records. A rule or order under this chapter may require each investment adviser to a private fund to file reports containing such information as the administrator deems necessary and appropriate in the public interest and for the protection of investors. (e) Audits or inspections. The records of a broker-dealer registered or required to be registered under this chapter and of an investment adviser registered or required to be registered under this chapter, including the records of a private fund described in paragraph (d) and the records of investment advisers to private funds, are subject to such reasonable periodic, special, or other audits or inspections by a representative of the administrator, within or without this state, as the administrator considers necessary or appropriate in the public interest and for the protection of investors. An audit or inspection may be made at any time and without prior notice. The administrator may copy, and remove for audit or inspection copies of, all records the administrator reasonably considers necessary or appropriate to conduct the audit or inspection. The administrator may assess a reasonable charge for conducting an audit or inspection under this subsection. (f) Custody and discretionary authority bond or insurance. Subject to Section 15(h) of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934 (15 U.S.C. Section 78o(h)) or Section 222 of the Investment Advisers Act of 1940 (15 U.S.C. Section 80b-22), a rule adopted or order issued under this chapter may require a broker-dealer or investment adviser that has custody of or discretionary authority over funds or securities of a customer or client to obtain insurance or post a bond or other satisfactory form of security in an amount of at least $25,000, but not to exceed $100,000. The administrator may determine the requirements of the insurance, bond, or other satisfactory form of security. Insurance or a bond or other satisfactory form of security may not be required of a broker-dealer registered under this chapter whose net capital exceeds, or of an investment adviser registered under this chapter whose minimum financial requirements exceed, the amounts required by rule or order under this chapter. The insurance, bond, or other satisfactory form of security must permit an action by a person to enforce any liability on the insurance, bond, or other satisfactory form of security if instituted within the time limitations in section 80A.76(j)(2). (g) Requirements for custody. Subject to Section 15(h) of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934 (15 U.S.C. Section 78o(h)) or Section 222 of the Investment Advisers Act of 1940 (15 U.S.C. Section 80b-22), an agent may not have custody of funds or securities of a customer except under the supervision of a broker-dealer and an investment adviser representative may not have custody of funds or securities of a client except under the supervision of an investment adviser or a federal covered investment adviser. A rule adopted or order issued under this chapter may prohibit, limit, or impose conditions on a broker-dealer regarding custody of funds or securities of a customer and on an investment adviser regarding custody of securities or funds of a client. (h) Investment adviser brochure rule. With respect to an investment adviser registered or required to be registered under this chapter, a rule adopted or order issued under this chapter may require that information or other record be furnished or disseminated to clients or prospective clients in this state as necessary or appropriate in the public interest and for the protection of investors and advisory clients. (i) Continuing education. A rule adopted or order issued under this chapter may require an individual registered under section 80A.57 or 80A.58 to participate in a continuing education program approved by the Securities and Exchange Commission and administered by a self-regulatory organizationnew text begin , the North American Securities Administrators Association, or the commissionernew text end . Sec. 9. new text begin SECURITIES BROKER-DEALER CONDUCT; EXPEDITED RULEMAKING.new text end new text begin The commissioner of commerce must adopt rules amending Minnesota Rules, part 2876.5021, to reflect that NASD is now referred to as FINRA and to comply with FINRA's new securities broker-dealer conduct rules. The commissioner of commerce may use the expedited rulemaking process under Minnesota Statutes, section 14.389, to amend Minnesota Rules, part 2876.5021, under this section. new text end